Maine, session 132, LD1911.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§17, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 684, §2, is further
amended to read:
C. The statement on proposed legislation prepared by the State Court Administrator
must be considered in the preparation of the fiscal note included in a committee
amendment or other amendment if the legislation or amendment has a fiscal impact on
the judicial system, as determined by the State Court Administrator; and
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§18, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 684, §3, is amended
by amending subparagraph (8) to read:
(8) Provide a mechanism for the retention of all information submitted to or
communicated by or within the system.; and
Sec. 3. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§19 is enacted to read:
19. Review for automatic sealing of criminal history record information. Establish
and maintain a process by which the Administrative Office of the Courts must perform its
obligations to assist with the automatic sealing of criminal history record information for
eligible criminal convictions as provided under Title 15, section 2403.
Sec. 4. 15 MRSA c. 313 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 313
AUTOMATIC SEALING OF CERTAIN CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION
§2401. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Bureau. "Bureau" means the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police,
State Bureau of Identification.
2. Criminal history record information. "Criminal history record information" has
the same meaning as in Title 16, section 703, subsection 3.
3. Criminal justice agency. "Criminal justice agency" has the same meaning as in
Title 16, section 703, subsection 4.
4. Dissemination. "Dissemination" has the same meaning as in Title 16, section 703,
subsection 6.
5. Eligible criminal conviction. "Eligible criminal conviction" means:
A. A conviction for a current or former Class E crime, except a conviction for a current
or former Class E crime under Title 17-A, chapter 11;
B. A conviction for a current or former Class D crime, except:
(1) A conviction for a current or former Class D crime under Title 17-A, chapter
11 or 12;
Page 1 - 132LR2382(01)

(2) A conviction for violation of condition of release under section 1092,
committed while the defendant was on preconviction or post-conviction bail for a
crime under Title 17-A, chapter 11 or 12;
(3) A conviction for a current or former Class D crime under Title 17-A, section
852, 853 or 855;
(4) A conviction for assault under Title 17-A, section 207 if the defendant was or
could have been charged with a crime under Title 17-A, chapter 11 or 12 arising
out of the same course of conduct;
(5) A conviction for stalking under Title 17-A, section 210-A or domestic violence
stalking under Title 17-A, section 210-C;
(6) Unless a sentence has been commuted, a conviction involving a crime of
domestic violence or a crime involving domestic violence, as defined in section
1003, subsection 3-A;
(7) A violation of a protective order, as specified in section 321, subsection 6; Title
5, section 4659, subsection 1; Title 17-A, section 506-B; Title 19-A, former section
4011, subsection 3; Title 19-A, former section 4012, subsection 5; or Title 19-A,
section 4113, subsection 1;
(8) A conviction for cruelty to animals under Title 17, section 1031;
(9) A conviction for a crime against a family or household member, as defined in
Title 19-A, former section 4002, subsection 4, regardless of whether the
relationship was an element of that crime, if less than 20 years have passed since
the judgment of conviction was entered; or
(10) A conviction for the crime of violation of a condition of release, pursuant to
section 1092, committed while the defendant is released on preconviction or post-
conviction bail for a charge that involves a crime against a family or household
member, as defined in Title 19-A, former section 4002, subsection 4, regardless of
whether the relationship was an element of that crime, if less than 20 years have
passed since the judgment of conviction was entered;
C. Unlawful possession of scheduled drugs under Title 17-A, section 1107-A or Title
17-A, former section 1107;
D. A conviction for any other crime under Title 17-A, chapter 45 not otherwise
specified in paragraph C, except for a conviction for a Class A crime under section
1105-A or a conviction for a crime that involved the use of a firearm; and
E. A conviction for a crime committed prior to January 30, 2017 for:
(1) Aggravated trafficking, furnishing or cultivation of scheduled drugs under Title
17-A, former section 1105 when the person was convicted of cultivating scheduled
drugs, that scheduled drug was marijuana and the underlying crime was a Class D
or Class E crime;
(2) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D,
subsection 1, paragraph A, subparagraph (4);
(3) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D,
subsection 1, paragraph B-1, subparagraph (4);
Page 2 - 132LR2382(01)

(4) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D,
subsection 1, paragraph C, subparagraph (4); or
(5) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D,
subsection 1, paragraph D, subparagraph (4).
§2402. Prerequisites for automatic sealing of criminal history record information
Criminal history record information relating to one or more specific criminal
convictions may be sealed under this chapter only if:
1. Eligible criminal conviction. The criminal conviction is:
A. An eligible criminal conviction that is a Class D or Class E crime and 5 years have
passed since the date of conviction; or
B. An eligible criminal conviction that is a Class A, Class B or Class C crime and 10
years have passed since the date of conviction, and the person who is the subject of the
criminal history record information has completed the person's sentence, including any
period of supervised release;
2. Other convictions in this State. Since the time at which the person who is the
subject of the criminal history record information fully satisfied each of the sentencing
alternatives imposed under Title 17-A, section 1502, subsection 2 for the person's most
recent eligible criminal conviction up until the time the bureau submits the criminal history
record information related to that eligible criminal conviction to the Administrative Office
of the Courts under section 2403, subsection 2, the person has not been convicted of a crime
in this State and has not had a criminal charge dismissed as a result of a deferred disposition
pursuant to Title 17-A, former chapter 54-F or Title 17-A, chapter 67, subchapter 4; and
3. Pending criminal charges. The person who is the subject of the criminal history
record information does not have any pending criminal charges in this State.
§2403. Automatic sealing of criminal history record information
Criminal history record information for an eligible criminal conviction must be sealed
in accordance with this section if the eligible criminal conviction and the conduct of the
person who is the subject of the criminal history record information satisfy the requirements
of section 2402.
1. Monthly examination of records. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Administrative
Office of the Courts shall examine electronic case records at least once per month and
compile a list of criminal history record information that meets the requirements of section
2402.
2. Sealing orders. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall forward the list
compiled under subsection 1 to the court with jurisdiction over the underlying criminal
proceedings. The courts within that judicial district shall promptly issue sealing orders
based on the received list.
3. Notice to bureau. Upon issuing a sealing order under subsection 2, the court shall
electronically transmit notice of the order to the bureau. Within 14 days of receipt, the
bureau shall update its records to reflect that the criminal history record information related
to the eligible criminal conviction is sealed and that its dissemination is governed by section
2265.
Page 3 - 132LR2382(01)

4. Cooperation. The Administrative Office of the Courts; Department of Public
Safety, Bureau of State Police; Department of Corrections; judicial branch; and criminal
justice agencies that collect, maintain or disseminate criminal history record information
shall cooperate with the bureau and assist it with carrying out the purposes and duties of
this section.
§2404. Limited disclosure of sealed eligible criminal conviction
A person whose eligible criminal conviction is the subject of a sealing order under
section 2403 may respond to inquiries from persons other than criminal justice agencies
and other entities that are authorized to obtain the sealed criminal history record
information under section 2265 by not disclosing the existence of the eligible criminal
conviction without being subject to any sanctions under the laws of this State. Other than
when responding to criminal justice agencies or when under oath while being prosecuted
for a subsequent crime, a person whose eligible criminal conviction is the subject of a
sealing order does not violate Title 17-A, section 451, 452 or 453 by failing to disclose the
eligible criminal conviction.
§2405. Motion to seal criminal history record information
This chapter may not be construed to prevent a person from filing a written motion
seeking a court order to seal the person's criminal history record information relating to a
specific criminal conviction in accordance with section 2263.